Maryland, session 2026, SB0596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–219.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0596*

SENATE BILL 596
(2) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” MEANS A COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER FOR RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE THAT:
(I) HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY
DEMAND OF AT LEAST 25 MEGAWATTS; AND
(II) HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE A LOAD FACTOR OF MORE
THAN 80%.
(3) “SURPLUS INTERCONNECTION” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF
INTERCONNECTION CAPACITY AVAILABLE AT AN EXISTING INTERCONNECTION
POINT THAT IS NOT CURRENTLY BEING UTILIZED BY EXISTING GENERATION
FACILITIES.
(B) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT PURCHASES INTERCONNECTION
CAPACITY FROM INTERCONNECTION POINTS WITH SURPLUS INTERCONNECTION
POTENTIAL IS EXEMPT FROM REQUIREMENTS TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THAT
LOCATION.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN INTERCONNECTION
PROCESS FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
(2) THE PROCESS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A STANDARD TIMELINE; AND
2. AN EXPEDITED TIMELINE FOR LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMERS THAT PROVIDE INTERCONNECTION CAPACITY FOR 100% OF THEIR
LOAD; AND
(II) MAY NOT IMPACT THE TIMEFRAME OR ABILITY OF
CUSTOMERS THAT ARE NOT LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS TO INTERCONNECT TO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT
THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 4–212 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) (1) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER MAY NOT INTERCONNECT TO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM UNLESS THE CUSTOMER PROVIDES INTERCONNECTION
CAPACITY FOR 25% OF THE CUSTOMER’S LOAD THROUGH:

SENATE BILL 596 3
(I) BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES;
(II) PURCHASING CAPACITY WITH NEWLY INTERCONNECTED
ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES WITHIN THE LOAD ZONE OR LOCAL DELIVERY AREA;
(III) PURCHASING CAPACITY WITH NEW CARBON–FREE ASSETS
IN THE LOAD ZONE OR LOCAL DELIVERY AREA; OR
(IV) DEMAND RESPONSE.
(2) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT PROVIDES CAPACITY FOR 100%
OF THE CUSTOMER’S LOAD THROUGH ANY OF THE METHODS SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND PAYS THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
SHALL BE PRIORITIZED FOR:
(I) LOAD STUDIES;
(II) INTERCONNECTION; AND
(III) PERMITTING.
(3) ANY CAPACITY THAT A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER PURCHASES
THROUGH THE USE OF SURPLUS INTERCONNECTION SHALL OFFSET THE CAPACITY
PROVIDED THROUGH THE METHODS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) BEFORE SIGNING A CONTRACT FOR SERVICE, A LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER SHALL:
(I) SUBMIT A REQUEST FOR A LOAD STUDY TO DETERMINE THE
NECESSARY CONTRACT CAPACITY FOR THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER; AND
(II) PAY:
1. A FEE IN AN AMOUNT TO BE SET BY THE COMMISSION
BUT NOT LESS THAN $ 1,000 PER MEGAWATT OF LOAD TO BE SERVED; AND
2. ANY OTHER APPLICABLE FEES ASSOCIATED WITH THE
STUDY.
(2) THE FEES REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE USED ONLY AS FOLLOWS:

SENATE BILL 596
(I) 50% OF THE FEES COLLECTED SHALL BE USED FOR THE
ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–512.1 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(II) 50% OF THE FEES COLLECTED SHALL BE USED FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT’S EMPOWER
MARYLAND LIMITED INCOME ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROGRAM.
7–1008.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–219.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM
FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL OFFER EACH LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT
PARTICIPATES IN THE PROGRAM THE OPTION OF CONTRACTING FOR:
(1) 6 NONCONSECUTIVE 4–HOUR PERIODS OF LOAD MANAGEMENT OR
DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT TIME SLOTS PER CALENDAR YEAR; OR
(2) 10 NONCONSECUTIVE 10–HOUR PERIODS OF LOAD MANAGEMENT
OR DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT TIME SLOTS PER CALENDAR YEAR.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A CLEAR COMPENSATION STRUCTURE OR FINANCIAL
INCENTIVES FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPATION;
(2) ESTABLISH A CLEARLY DEFINED PENALTY SYSTEM FOR
NONPERFORMANCE DURING ANY FORCE MAJEURE EVENTS BY A PARTICIPATING
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER;
(3) ESTABLISH A DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS; AND

SENATE BILL 596 5
(4) ESTABLISH MULTIPLE NOTIFICATION AND COMMUNICATION
CHANNELS FOR PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
(E) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE PARTICIPATING LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMERS:
(1) 24 HOURS OF ADVANCE NOTICE OF POTENTIAL DEMAND
RESPONSE PERIODS; AND
(2) 30 MINUTES OF NOTICE BEFORE EACH DEMAND RESPONSE
PERIOD.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) PROHIBIT BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES
FROM BEING INCLUDED IN A PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S LOAD;
(2) DEVELOP GUIDELINES AND LIMITATIONS FOR CHARGING
BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES DURING CERTAIN PEAK
DEMAND, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(3) ESTABLISH A METHOD FOR MEASURING A PARTICIPATING LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER’S DEMAND RESPONSE PERFORMANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) IN MEASURING A PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S DEMAND
RESPONSE PERFORMANCE, THE COMMISSION SHALL FACTOR IN:
(1) NEW VIRTUAL POWER PLANT AGGREGATION OPTIONS
DEVELOPED BY ELECTRIC COMPANIES;
(2) FRONT–OF–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES; AND
(3) NONWIRE ALTERNATIVES, INCLUDING GRID ENHANCING
TECHNOLOGIES, THAT FEED ELECTRICITY BACK TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(H) A PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER CONSTRUCTING A
BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITY UNDER THE PROGRAM IS EXEMPT
FROM THE REQUIREMENTS TO:
(1) OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE; OR

SENATE BILL 596
(2) OBTAIN COMMISSION APPROVAL UNDER § 7–207.1 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 31, 2026, the Maryland Energy Administration shall
complete a study of each electricity supplier with generating facilities located in the State
to determine the surplus interconnection potential at each interconnection point.
(b) (1) The Administration shall report a summary of the results of the study
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
including the total surplus interconnection potential available in the State.
(2) The summary:
(i) shall describe the total surplus interconnection potential
available in the State; but
(ii) may not itemize the surplus interconnection potential by electric
company or interconnection point.
(c) The Administration shall share the results of the study with data center
developers in order to encourage the use of surplus interconnection.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.